Massachusetts, session 194th, H4757.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1A of chapter 40A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding the following 3 definitions:-
“Excluded Land”, land defined by reference to the ownership, use codes, use restrictions,
and hydrological characteristics in MassGIS and consists of the following: (i) All Publicly-
owned land, except for Lots or portions of Lots determined to be Developable public land; (ii)
All rivers, streams, lakes, ponds and other surface waterbodies; (iii) All wetland resource areas,
together with a buffer zone around wetlands and waterbodies equivalent to the minimum setback
required by 310 CMR 15.00: The State Environmental Code, Title 5: Standard Requirements for
the Siting, Construction, Inspection, Upgrade and Expansion of On-site Sewage Treatment and
Disposal Systems and for the TransPort and Disposal of Septage; (iv) Protected open space and
recreational land that is legally protected in perpetuity (for example, land owned by a local land
trust or subject to a conservation restriction), or that is likely to remain undeveloped due to
functional or traditional use (for example, cemeteries); (v) All Public rights-of-way and Private
rights-of-way; (vi) Privately-owned land on which development is prohibited to protect private
of 5

or public water supplies, including, but not limited to, Zone I wellhead protection areas and Zone
A surface water supply protection areas; (vii) Privately-owned land used for educational or
institutional uses such as a hospital, prison, electric, water, wastewater or other utility, museum,
or private school, college or university. If privately owned land that would otherwise be excluded
is no longer being used for such educational or institutional uses, EOHLC may determine that
such land no longer being so used is Developable Land.
“Calculable developable land”, land on which multi-family housing can be permitted and
constructed, consisting of (a) all privately-owned land except Lots or portions of Lots that meet
the definition of Excluded land; and (b) Developable public land.
"Developable land area'', that area within an approved smart growth district that can be
feasibly developed into residential or mixed use development determined in accordance with
regulations of the department. Developable land area shall not include: (1) land area that is
already substantially developed, including existing parks and dedicated, perpetual open space
within such substantially developed portion; (2) open space designated by the city or town as
provided in section 6; or (3) areas exceeding one-half acre of contiguous land that are unsuitable
for development because of topographic features or for environmental reasons, such as wetlands.
SECTION 2. Section 9 of chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting
after the second paragraph the following paragraph:-
In a city or town where less than 10% of the housing units are located in multi-family
structures, the city or town shall establish one or more multifamily zoning districts consisting of
1.5% of all calculable developable land. The land within the multifamily zoning district(s)
should adhere to the definition of “developable land area” as defined in Section 1A of this
of 5

chapter. Zoning ordinances or by-laws shall establish a housing density for by-right multifamily
development in such zoning districts of not less than twenty (20) dwelling units per acre. As used
herein, “multifamily housing” means apartment or condominium units in buildings which
contain or will contain more than three (3) such units.
SECTION 3. (a) Section 9 of chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in the fifth paragraph, the words “open space residential developments or”.
(b) Section 9 of chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the
sixth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, zoning ordinances or by-
laws shall provide that open space residential development shall be permitted by right in
residential zoning districts at the density permitted in the zoning district in which the property is
located upon review and approval by a planning board pursuant to the applicable provisions of
sections 81K to 81GG, inclusive, of chapter 41 and in accordance with its rules and regulations
governing subdivision control. Zoning ordinances and by-laws shall not require the submission
of a plan showing a standard subdivision complying with the otherwise applicable requirements
of the ordinance or by-laws as a condition precedent to the approval of an open space residential
development plan.
(c) Section 81Q of chapter 41, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the
second sentence the following sentence:-
Such rules shall not require the submission of a plan showing a standard subdivision
complying with the requirements of the local zoning ordinance or by-laws as a condition
of 5

precedent to the approval of a plan depicting an open space residential development pursuant to
section 9 of chapter 40A.
SECTION 4. (a) The twelfth paragraph of Section 9 of chapter 40A, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by deleting the words “a two-thirds vote of boards with more than five
members, a vote of at least four members of a five member board, and a unanimous vote of a
three member board” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- the concurring vote of
a majority of the members then in office.
(b) The fourth paragraph of Section 15 of chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by deleting the words “all members of the board of appeals consisting of three
members, and a concurring vote of four members of a board consisting of five members” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- the concurring vote of a majority of the members
of the board of appeals then in office.
SECTION 5. All cities and towns in the commonwealth shall determine their calculable
developable land by December 1st, 2026.
SECTION 6. Chapter 121A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following section:
Section 20. There shall be a commission to study reforms to area median income limits
across the commonwealth to facilitate the access to more affordable housing opportunities.
The commission shall consist of: 2 members of the Senate, 1 of whom shall represent a
Gateway Municipality as defined in section 3A of chapter 23A of the General Laws and shall
serve as co-chair; 2 members of the House of Representatives, 1 of whom shall represent a
of 5

Gateway Municipality and shall serve as co-chair; 3 members appointed by the governor, 1 of
whom shall represent the Massachusetts Association of Regional Planning Agencies, 1 of whom
shall represent Abundant Housing Massachusetts, 1 of whom shall represent the Massachusetts
Municipal Association; and 6 members appointed by the Secretary of Housing and Economic
Development. The commission shall file a report of its findings and recommendations, including,
but not limited to, legislative, regulatory, and procedural changes, with the clerks of the senate
and house of representatives, the chairs of the joint committee on housing not later than
December 31, 2026.
of 5